District of Columbia statutes.
48-801.02

Posters to be furnished pharmacies; contents.

Ten days prior to each issue date, the Office of Consumer Protection shall furnish to each pharmacy in the District a poster suitable for display of a type style and size so as to be easily readable at a reasonable distance, which:

(1)

Lists the 100 most commonly used prescription drugs in 2 commonly prescribed quantities, with space for the current selling price of each quantity;

(2)

Lists professional and convenience services, with space for each pharmacy to indicate:

(A)

Whether it offers each service; and

(B)

The additional charge, if any, for that service;

(3)

Contains a heading stating “OUR CURRENT PRESCRIPTION PRICES” and containing spaces for the insertion of the name and address of each pharmacy;

(4)

Indicates in simple language that:

(A)

The price of a prescription drug is often different at different pharmacies, and that the consumer may want to make a comparison on the cost of a prescription;

(B)

The pharmacy may be able to substitute a less expensive drug which is therapeutically equivalent to the one prescribed by the consumer’s doctor, unless the consumer does not approve; and

(C)

The consumer has the right to know the exact price of a prescription before it is filled; and

(5)

Provides space for each pharmacy to indicate the eligibility and terms of any discount it offers on legend drugs.

Sept. 10, 1976, D.C. Law 1-81, title I, § 102, 23 DCR 2460
Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-114, § 3(c), 23 DCR 8743
1981 Ed., § 33-712.
1973 Ed., § 33-812.